Wisconsin, session 2025, AB984.
do enact as follows:AB984,11Section 1. 50.01 (1f) of the statutes is created to read:AB984,2,4250.01 (1f) “Client group” means a group of individuals who need similar 3services because of a common disability, condition, or status. “Client group” 4includes all of the following groups of individuals:AB984,2,65(a) Individuals with functional impairments that commonly accompany 6advanced age.AB984,2,77(b) Individuals with irreversible dementia, such as Alzheimer’s disease.AB984,2,88(c) Individuals who have a developmental disability, as defined in s. 51.01 (5).AB984,2,109(d) Individuals who are emotionally disturbed or who have a mental illness, as 10defined in s. 51.01 (13) (a).AB984,2,1211(e) Individuals who are alcoholics, as defined in s. 51.01 (1h), or who are drug 12dependent, as defined in s. 51.01 (8b).AB984,2,1313(f) Individuals with physical disabilities.AB984,2,1414(g) Individuals who are pregnant and in need of counseling services.AB984,2,1615(h) Individuals who are prisoners, as defined in s. 302.388 (1) (f), or under the 16legal jurisdiction of a criminal court.AB984,2,1717(i) Individuals diagnosed as terminally ill.AB984,2,1818(j) Individuals with traumatic brain injuries.AB984,2,1919(k) Individuals with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.AB984,220Section 2. 50.035 (9) of the statutes is created to read:AB984,3,1150.035 (9) Memory care designation. (a) In this subsection:AB984,3,421. “Administrator” means an employee, including the licensee under this 3subchapter, or an employee designated by the licensee, who is responsible for the 4management and day-to-day operation of a community-based residential facility.AB984,3,1452. “Resident care staff” means the licensee under this subchapter and all 6employees of a community-based residential facility who have one or more of the 7following responsibilities for residents: supervising a resident’s activities or 8whereabouts, managing or administering a resident’s medications, providing 9personal care or treatments for a resident, or planning or conducting training or 10activity programming for a resident. “Resident care staff” does not include 11volunteers and employees who work exclusively in the food service, maintenance, 12laundry service, housekeeping, transportation, or security or clerical areas and 13employees that do not work on the premises of the community-based residential 14facility.AB984,3,1815(b) Beginning on July 1, 2027, a community-based residential facility may use 16the designation of “memory care” in its name, advertising, or communications only 17if it serves the client group for individuals with irreversible dementia, such as 18Alzheimer’s disease, and does all of the following:AB984,3,22191. Ensures that, as part of the initial training required for the administrator 20and resident care staff of the community-based residential facility, the 21administrator and resident care staff receive or have already received training that 22includes all of the following:AB984,4,223a. An introduction to dementia, including understanding Alzheimer’s disease 1and other dementias and including causes, progression, symptoms, and the impact 2on individuals and caregivers.AB984,4,53b. Person-centered dementia care, including strategies to provide 4individualized, compassionate care that respects the preferences and needs of each 5person.AB984,4,76c. Effective communication, including techniques for engaging with 7individuals with cognitive impairments to promote communication.AB984,4,108d. Behavioral interventions and alternatives to medication, including 9approaches to managing distressing behaviors such as aggression, wandering, and 10agitation using nonpharmacological interventions.AB984,4,1211e. Supporting independence and quality of life, including encouraging dignity, 12autonomy, and meaningful engagement in daily activities.AB984,4,16132. Ensures that, as part of the annual continuing education required for the 14administrator and resident care staff of the community-based residential facility, 15the administrator and resident care staff annually receive training that includes all 16of the subjects in subd. 1. a. to e.AB984,317Section 3. Nonstatutory provisions.AB984,4,2218(1) A community-based residential facility providing memory care before July 191, 2027, and intending to continue services using a memory care designation under 20s. 50.035 (9) on or after July 1, 2027, shall be in full compliance with the 21requirements under s. 50.035 (9) by July 1, 2027, to continue operations under a 22memory care designation.AB984,4,2323